Wisconsin, session 2025, AB108.
do enact as follows:AB108,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB108,27Section 2. 20.155 (1) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB108,2,10820.155 (1) (a) Nuclear power siting study. As a continuing appropriation, the 9amounts in the schedule for conducting the nuclear power siting study under s. 10196.025 (8) (b).AB108,311Section 3. 196.025 (8) of the statutes is created to read:AB108,2,1312196.025 (8) Nuclear power siting study. (a) Definition. In this subsection, 13“advanced nuclear reactor” has the meaning given in 42 USC 16271 (b) (1).AB108,2,1514(b) Nuclear power siting study. 1. The commission shall conduct a nuclear 15power siting study that does all of the following:AB108,2,1716a. Identifies nuclear power generation opportunities on existing nuclear and 17nonnuclear power generation sites.AB108,2,1918b. Identifies new nuclear power and fusion energy generation sites not 19currently dedicated to power generation.AB108,2,2220c. Identifies sites for the development and demonstration of nuclear power 21generation and advanced technologies derived from and associated with nuclear 22fission and fusion, including advanced nuclear reactors.AB108,3,31d. Develops and provides guidance for advanced nuclear fission and fusion 2reactors including small modular reactors and fusion energy generating 3technologies.AB108,3,64e. Considers the siting study conducted by the U.S. department of energy in 52024, titled “Evaluation of Nuclear Power Plant and Coal Power Plant Sites for New 6Nuclear Capacity.”AB108,3,872. The commission may use a request-for-proposal process to contract with a 83rd party to conduct all or part of the study required under subd. 1.AB108,3,1293. On or before the first day of 13th month beginning after the effective date of 10this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], the commission shall submit a report 11containing the results of the study required under subd. 1. to the legislature in the 12manner provided in s. 13.172 (2).AB108,413Section 4. 196.491 (3) (g) of the statutes is renumbered 196.491 (3) (g) 1.AB108,514Section 5. 196.491 (3) (g) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB108,4,215196.491 (3) (g) 2. Notwithstanding subd. 1., the commission shall take final 16action on an application filed under par. (a) 1. for a large electric generating facility 17that contains an advanced nuclear reactor, as defined in s. 196.025 (8) (a), within 18150 days after the application is determined or considered to be complete under par. 19(a) 2. If the commission fails to take final action within the 150-day period, the 20commission is considered to have issued a certificate of public convenience and 21necessity with respect to the application, unless the chairperson of the commission 22extends the time period for no more than an additional 150 days for good cause. If 23the commission fails to take action within the extended period, the commission is 1considered to have issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity with 2respect to the application.AB108,63Section 6. Initial applicability.AB108,4,64(1) The treatment of s. 196.491 (3) (g) 2. first applies to an application for a 5certificate of public convenience and necessity that is determined or considered by 6the public service commission to be complete on the effective date of this subsection.AB108,77Section 7. Effective date.AB108,4,98(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 9publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB108,4,1010